Massachusetts, session 194th, H3604.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1 Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule or regulation to the
contrary, the department of highways shall install signage on all bridges of the commonwealth
under its jurisdiction. There shall be two signs on each bridge at either end of said bridges. The
signs shall contain "988 Suicide Prevention" and any other information necessary to convey to
individuals that an alternative to suicide exists and help is available by calling said number.
Such signs shall be of a reasonable size that is easily readable by either pedestrians or drivers
using the bridge as determined by the department of highways.
SECTION 2 Signage on all commonwealth bridges shall be installed by the
department of highways within one year of the passage of this act.
of 1